Vermont, session 2025-2026, H539.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 123 is amended to read:
§ 123. DUTIES OF OFFICE
* * *
(j)(1) The Office may inquire into the criminal background histories of
applicants for initial licensure and for license renewal of any Office-issued
credential, including a license, certification, registration, or specialty
designation for the following professions:
* * *
(M) occupational therapists licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 71;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 2 of 46
(N) peer support providers and peer recovery support specialists
certified under 26 V.S.A. chapter 60;
(O) community-based perinatal doulas certified under 26 V.S.A. chapter
84; and
(P) Barbers, cosmetologists, estheticians, and nail technicians.
* * *
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. § 282 is amended to read:
§ 282. SHOP; LICENSE
(a) A shop shall not be granted a license unless the shop complies with the
rules of the Director and has a designated in-state licensee responsible for
overall cleanliness, sanitation, and safety of the shop.
(b) The practices of barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring shall
be permitted only in shops licensed by the Director, except as provided in
sections 273 and 281 of this chapter and the rules of the Director.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. § 284 is amended to read:
§ 284. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE
(a) The Director shall issue a license to an applicant who has passed the
examination as determined by the Director, has paid the required fee, and has
completed all the requirements for the particular license.
(b) The Director shall issue a license to the person who owns or controls a
shop or school of barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring who:
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 3 of 46
(1) has paid the required fee;
(2) has a designated in-state licensee responsible for overall cleanliness,
sanitation, and safety of the shop; and
(3) is in compliance with the rules of the Director and the provisions of
this chapter.
(c) The license shall be conspicuously displayed for the customer in the
licensee’s principal office, place of business, or place of employment.
Sec. 4. 26 V.S.A. chapter 6, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Cosmetology License Compact
§ 291. PURPOSE
(a) The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the interstate practice and
regulation of cosmetology with the goal of improving public access to, and the
safety of, cosmetology services and reducing unnecessary burdens related to
cosmetology licensure. Through this compact, the member states seek to
establish a regulatory framework which provides for a new multistate licensing
program. Through this new licensing program, the member states seek to
provide increased value and mobility to licensed cosmetologists in the member
states, while ensuring the provision of safe, effective, and reliable services to
the public.
(b) This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives, and the
member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto:
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 4 of 46
(1) provide opportunities for interstate practice by cosmetologists who
meet uniform requirements for multistate licensure;
(2) enhance the abilities of member states to protect public health and
safety, and prevent fraud and unlicensed activity within the profession;
(3) ensure and encourage cooperation between member states in the
licensure and regulation of the practice of cosmetology;
(4) support relocating military members and their spouses;
(5) facilitate the exchange of information between member states related
to the licensure, investigation, and discipline of the practice of cosmetology;
and
(6) provide for the licensure and mobility of the workforce in the
profession, while addressing the shortage of workers and lessening the
associated burdens on the member states.
§ 292. DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following
definitions shall govern the terms herein:
(1) “Active military member” means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
(2) “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a member state’s laws which is imposed by a state
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 5 of 46
licensing authority or other regulatory body against a cosmetologist, including
actions against an individual’s license or authorization to practice such as
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation of the
licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on a license affecting an
individual’s ability to participate in the cosmetology industry, including the
issuance of a cease and desist order.
(3) “Authorization to practice” means a legal authorization associated
with a multistate license permitting the practice of cosmetology in that remote
state, which shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the state
licensing authority in that remote state.
(4) “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring or
prosecutorial diversion program approved by a member state’s state licensing
authority.
(5) “Background check” means the submission of information for an
applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record
information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining state criminal or
disciplinary history in the applicant’s home state.
(6) “Charter member state” means member states who have enacted
legislation to adopt this compact where such legislation predates the effective
date of this compact as defined in section 303 of this title.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 6 of 46
(7) “Commission” means the government agency whose membership
consists of all states that have enacted this compact, which is known as the
Cosmetology Licensure Compact Commission, as defined in section 299 of
this title, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
(8) “Cosmetologist” means an individual licensed in their home state to
practice cosmetology.
(9) “Cosmetology,” “cosmetology services,” and the “practice of
cosmetology” mean the care and services provided by a cosmetologist as set
forth in the member state’s statutes and regulations in the state where the
services are being provided.
(10) “Current significant investigative information” means:
(A) investigative information that a state licensing authority, after an
inquiry or investigation that complies with a member state’s due process
requirements, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would
indicate a violation of that state’s laws regarding fraud or the practice of
cosmetology; or
(B) investigative information that indicates that a licensee has
engaged in fraud or represents an immediate threat to public health and safety,
regardless of whether the licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to
respond.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 7 of 46
(11) “Data system” means a repository of information about licensees,
including, but not limited to, license status, investigative information, and
adverse actions.
(12) “Disqualifying event” means any event which shall disqualify an
individual from holding a multistate license under this compact, which the
Commission may by rule or order specify.
(13) “Encumbered license” means a license in which an adverse action
restricts the practice of cosmetology by a licensee, or where said adverse action
has been reported to the Commission.
(14) “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of cosmetology by a state
licensing authority.
(15) “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the
Commission.
(16) “Home state” means the member state which is a licensee’s primary
state of residence, and where that licensee holds an active and unencumbered
license to practice cosmetology.
(17) “Investigative information” means information, records, or
documents received or generated by a state licensing authority pursuant to an
investigation or other inquiry.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 8 of 46
(18) “Jurisprudence requirement” means the assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of
cosmetology in a state.
(19) “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds a license from
a member state to practice as a cosmetologist.
(20) “Member state” means any state that has adopted this compact.
(21) “Multistate license” means a license issued by and subject to the
enforcement jurisdiction of the state licensing authority in a licensee’s home
state, which authorizes the practice of cosmetology in member states and
includes authorizations to practice cosmetology in all remote states pursuant to
this compact.
(22) “Remote state” means any member state, other than the licensee’s
home state.
(23) “Rule” means any rule or regulation promulgated by the
Commission under this compact which has the force of law.
(24) “Single-state license” means a cosmetology license issued by a
member state that authorizes practice of cosmetology only within the issuing
state and does not include any authorization outside of the issuing state.
(25) “State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States
and the District of Columbia.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 9 of 46
(26) “State licensing authority” means a member state’s regulatory body
responsible for issuing cosmetology licenses or otherwise overseeing the
practice of cosmetology in that state.
§ 293. MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS
(a) To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a
member state, a state must:
(1) License and regulate cosmetology;
(2) Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate
complaints about licensees practicing in that state;
(3) Require that licensees within the state pass a cosmetology
competency examination prior to being licensed to provide cosmetology
services to the public in that state;
(4) Require that licensees satisfy educational or training requirements in
cosmetology prior to being licensed to provide cosmetology services to the
public in that state;
(5) Implement procedures for considering one or more of the following
categories of information from applicants for licensure: criminal history;
disciplinary history; or background check. Such procedures may include the
submission of information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
applicant’s background check as defined herein;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 10 of 46
(6) Participate in the data system, including through the use of unique
identifying numbers;
(7) Share information related to adverse actions with the Commission
and other member states, both through the data system and otherwise;
(8) Notify the Commission and other member states, in compliance with
the terms of the Compact and rules of the Commission, of the existence of
investigative information or current significant investigative information in the
state’s possession regarding a licensee practicing in that state;
(9) Comply with such rules as may be enacted by the Commission to
administer the Compact; and
(10) Accept licensees from other member states as established herein.
(b) Member states may charge a fee for granting a license to practice
cosmetology.
(c) Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to
apply for a member state’s single-state license as provided under the laws of
each member state. However, the single-state license granted to these
individuals shall not be recognized as granting a multistate license to provide
services in any other member state.
(d) Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single-state license.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 11 of 46
(e) A multistate license issued to a licensee by a home state to a resident of
that state shall be recognized by each member state as authorizing a licensee to
practice cosmetology in each member state.
(f) At no point shall the Commission have the power to define the
educational or professional requirements for a license to practice cosmetology.
The member states shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these
requirements.
§ 294. MULTISTATE LICENSE
(a) To be eligible to apply to their home state’s state licensing authority for
an initial multistate license under this compact, a licensee must hold an active
and unencumbered single-state license to practice cosmetology in their home
state.
(b) Upon the receipt of an application for a multistate license, according to
the rules of the Commission, a member state’s state licensing authority shall
ascertain whether the applicant meets the requirements for a multistate license
under this compact.
(c) If an applicant meets the requirements for a multistate license under this
compact and any applicable rules of the Commission, the state licensing
authority in receipt of the application shall, within a reasonable time, grant a
multistate license to that applicant, and inform all member states of the grant of
said multistate license.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 12 of 46
(d) A multistate license to practice cosmetology issued by a member state’s
state licensing authority shall be recognized by each member state as
authorizing the practice thereof as though that licensee held a single-state
license to do so in each member state, subject to the restrictions herein.
(e) A multistate license granted pursuant to this compact may be effective
for a definite period of time, concurrent with the licensure renewal period in
the home state.
(f) To maintain a multistate license under this compact, a licensee must:
(1) agree to abide by the rules of the state licensing authority, and the
state scope of practice laws governing the practice of cosmetology, of any
member state in which the licensee provides services;
(2) pay all required fees related to the application and process, and any
other fees which the Commission may by rule require; and
(3) comply with any and all other requirements regarding multistate
licenses which the Commission may by rule provide.
(g) A licensee practicing in a member state is subject to all scope of
practice laws governing cosmetology services in that state.
(h) The practice of cosmetology under a multistate license granted pursuant
to this compact will subject the licensee to the jurisdiction of the state licensing
authority, the courts, and the laws of the member state in which the
cosmetology services are provided.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 13 of 46
§ 295. REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME
STATE
(a) A licensee may hold a multistate license, issued by their home state, in
only one member state at any given time.
(b) If a licensee changes their home state by moving between two member
states:
(1) The licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance of their
multistate license in their new home state. The licensee shall pay all applicable
fees and notify the prior home state in accordance with the rules of the
Commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application to reissue a multistate license, the
new home state shall verify that the multistate license is active, unencumbered,
and eligible for reissuance under the terms of the Compact and the rules of the
Commission. The multistate license issued by the prior home state will be
deactivated and all member states notified in accordance with the applicable
rules adopted by the Commission.
(3) If required for initial licensure, the new home state may require a
background check as specified in the laws of that state, or the compliance with
any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this compact, if a licensee
does not meet the requirements set forth in this compact for the reissuance of a
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 14 of 46
multistate license by the new home state, then the licensee shall be subject to
the new home state requirements for the issuance of a single-state license in
that state.
(c) If a licensee changes their primary state of residence by moving from a
member state to a nonmember state, or from a nonmember state to a member
state, then the licensee shall be subject to the state requirements for the
issuance of a single-state license in the new home state.
(d) Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a
single-state license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of this
compact, a licensee shall have only one home state, and only one multistate
license.
(e) Nothing in this compact shall interfere with the requirements
established by a member state for the issuance of a single-state license.
§ 296. AUTHORITY OF THE COMPACT COMMISSION AND MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES
(a) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule or regulation of the Commission,
shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a
member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to
the practice of cosmetology in that state, where those laws, regulations, or
other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 15 of 46
(b) Insofar as practical, a member state’s state licensing authority shall
cooperate with the Commission and with each entity exercising independent
regulatory authority over the practice of cosmetology according to the
provisions of this compact.
(c) Discipline shall be the sole responsibility of the state in which
cosmetology services are provided. Accordingly, each member state’s state
licensing authority shall be responsible for receiving complaints about
individuals practicing cosmetology in that state and for communicating all
relevant investigative information about any such adverse action to the other
member states through the data system in addition to any other methods the
Commission may by rule require.
§ 297. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) A licensee’s home state shall have exclusive power to impose an
adverse action against a licensee’s multistate license issued by the home state.
(b) A home state may take adverse action on a multistate license based on
the investigative information, current significant investigative information, or
adverse action of a remote state.
(c) In addition to the powers conferred by state law, each remote state’s
state licensing authority shall have the power to:
(1) Take adverse action against a licensee’s authorization to practice
cosmetology through the multistate license in that member state, provided that:
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 16 of 46
(A) Only the licensee’s home state shall have the power to take
adverse action against the multistate license issued by the home state; and
(B) For the purposes of taking adverse action, the home state’s state
licensing authority shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct
received from a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within
the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to
determine the appropriate action.
(2) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a
licensee’s authorization to practice within that member state.
(3) Complete any pending investigations of a licensee who changes their
primary state of residence during the course of such an investigation. The state
licensing authority shall also be empowered to report the results of such an
investigation to the Commission through the data system as described herein.
(4) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a state licensing authority in a member state for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing state
licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 17 of 46
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or
evidence are located.
(5) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected
licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any
adverse action taken against that licensee.
(6) Take adverse action against the licensee’s authorization to practice
in that state based on the factual findings of another remote state.
(d) A licensee’s home state shall complete any pending investigation of a
cosmetologist who changes their primary state of residence during the course
of the investigation. The home state shall also have the authority to take
appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the data system.
(e) If an adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s
multistate license, the licensee’s authorization to practice in all other member
states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the
home state license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose an adverse
action against a licensee’s multistate license shall include a statement that the
cosmetologist’s authorization to practice is deactivated in all member states
during the pendency of the order.
(f) Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s authority to
accept a licensee’s participation in an alternative program in lieu of adverse
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 18 of 46
action. A licensee’s multistate license shall be suspended for the duration of
the licensee’s participation in any alternative program.
(g) Joint investigations.
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its
respective scope of practice laws or other applicable state law, a member state
may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under
the Compact.
§ 298. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR SPOUSES
Active military members, or their spouses, shall designate a home state
where the individual has a current license to practice cosmetology in good
standing. The individual may retain their home state designation during any
period of service when that individual or their spouse is on active duty
assignment.
§ 299. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COSMETOLOGY
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) The Compact member states hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all member states that have
enacted the Compact known as the Cosmetology Licensure Compact
Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact member
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 19 of 46
states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state. The
Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the
Compact as set forth in section 303 of this title.
(b) Membership, voting, and meetings.
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate selected
by that member state’s state licensing authority.
(2) The delegate shall be an administrator of the state licensing authority
of the member state or their designee.
(3) The Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
(5) A member state’s state licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of
its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that are
voted on by the Commission.
(7) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission
may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar electronic
means.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 20 of 46
(c) The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Adopt rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of
this compact, the Commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue
or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member
state as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate
an agent to do so on the Commission’s behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but
not limited to, employees of a member state;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define
duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of
the Compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 21 of 46
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
(12) As set forth in the Commission rules, charge a fee to a licensee for
the grant of a multistate license and thereafter, as may be established by
Commission rule, charge the licensee a multistate license renewal fee for each
renewal period. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a home state
from charging a licensee a fee for a multistate license or renewals of a
multistate license, or a fee for the jurisprudence requirement if the member
state imposes such a requirement for the grant of a multistate license;
(13) Assess and collect fees;
(14) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money,
other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(15) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(16) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(17) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(18) Borrow money;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 22 of 46
(19) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this compact and the bylaws;
(20) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
(21) Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer and such other
officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws;
(22) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and
a vice chair;
(23) Adopt and provide to the member states an annual report;
(24) Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially
different from the model Compact language such that the state would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
(25) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this compact.
(d) The Executive Committee.
(1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties,
and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 23 of 46
(A) overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact, including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the
Commission’s rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(B) recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or
bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to Compact member
states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
(C) ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
(D) preparing and recommending the budget;
(E) maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
(F) monitoring Compact compliance of member states and providing
compliance reports to the Commission;
(G) establishing additional committees as necessary;
(H) exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw; and
(I) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to seven voting
members:
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 24 of 46
(A) the Chair and Vice Chair of the Commission and any other
members of the Commission who serve on the Executive Committee shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee; and
(B) other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer, the
Commission shall elect three voting members from the current membership of
the Commission.
(C) The Commission may elect, ex officio, nonvoting members from
a recognized national cosmetology professional association as approved by the
Commission. The Commission’s bylaws shall identify qualifying
organizations and the manner of appointment if the number of organizations
seeking to appoint an ex officio member exceeds the number of members
specified in this section.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive
Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
(4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
(A) Annual Executive Committee meetings, as well as any Executive
Committee meeting at which it does not take or intend to take formal action on
a matter for which a Commission vote would otherwise be required, shall be
open to the public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed,
nonpublic session of a public meeting when dealing with any of the matters
covered under subdivision (f)(4) of this section.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 25 of 46
(B) The Executive Committee shall give five business days advance
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as determined to
provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the Executive
Committee intends to address at those meetings.
(5) The Executive Committee may hold an emergency meeting when
acting for the Commission to:
(A) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(B) prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds; or
(C) protect public health and safety.
(e) The Commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an
annual report.
(f) Meetings of the Commission.
(1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public
meetings shall be posted on the Commission’s website at least 30 days prior to
the public meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission
may convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least 24 hours prior
notice on the Commission’s website, and any other means as provided in the
Commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of
proposed rulemaking under subsection 301(l) of this title. The Commission’s
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 26 of 46
legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency
public meeting has been met.
(3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and
location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via
telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the notice
shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
(4) The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for
the Commission to discuss:
(A) noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the
Compact;
(B) the employment, compensation, discipline or other matters,
practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related
to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;
(C) current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Commission
or by a member state’s licensing authority;
(D) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(E) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
(F) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(G) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 27 of 46
(H) information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(I) investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(J) information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant
to the Compact;
(K) legal advice;
(L) matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by
federal or member state law; or
(M) other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
(5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer
shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant
exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
(6) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of
the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of
the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 28 of 46
(g) Financing of the Commission.
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it
grants a multistate license to cover the cost of the operations and activities of
the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to
cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission
shall promulgate by rule.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any member states, except by and with the authority of the
member state.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 29 of 46
bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the Commission.
(h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred, within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall
not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 30 of 46
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their
own counsel at their own expense; and provided further that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful
or wanton misconduct of that person.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of
any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise
abrogate a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 31 of 46
defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or
any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the member states or by the Commission.
§ 300. DATA SYSTEM
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system.
(b) The Commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate license a
unique identifier, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all
individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the
Commission, including:
(1) identifying information;
(2) licensure data;
(3) adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
(4) nonconfidential information related to alternative program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other
information related to such participation;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 32 of 46
(5) any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such
denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information
where prohibited by law;
(6) the existence of investigative information;
(7) the existence of current significant investigative information; and
(8) other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the
Commission.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to
this compact or through the data system, when certified by the Commission or
an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the
Commission and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any
relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member
state.
(e) The existence of current significant investigative information and the
existence of investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member
state will only be available to other member states.
(f) It is the responsibility of the member states to monitor the database to
determine whether adverse action has been taken against such a licensee or
license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 33 of 46
license applicant in any member state will be available to any other member
state.
(g) Member states contributing information to the data system may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
(h) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing
the information shall be removed from the data system.
§ 301. RULEMAKING
(a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because
the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond
the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or
based upon another applicable standard of review.
(b) The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
member state, provided however that where the rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the member state that establish the member state’s
scope of practice laws governing the practice of cosmetology as held by a court
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 34 of 46
of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in
that state to the extent of the conflict.
(c) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each rule.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or
portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner
used to adopt the Compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state or to
any state applying to participate in the Compact.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30
days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public
hearing on the proposed rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of
proposed rulemaking:
(1) on the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 35 of 46
(2) to persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) in such other ways as the Commission may by rule specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different,
the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Commission will consider
and vote on the proposed rule;
(2) if the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or
other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) the text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
(4) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested
person; and
(5) the manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the
proposed rule shall be available to the public.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 36 of 46
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing
on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at
hearings required by this section.
(k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of
the rule.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this section, the
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 45 days after the Commission
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule with five days’ notice, with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the
Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 37 of 46
the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must
be adopted immediately to:
(1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
(3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
(4) protect public health and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a
period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge
shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
without the approval of the Commission.
(n) No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
compact.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 38 of 46
§ 302. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) Oversight.
(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each
member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any
action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(1) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 39 of 46
promulgated rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default, and any other action that the Commission may
take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other member states.
(3) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may
be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date
of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(4) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature,
the defaulting state’s state licensing authority and each of the member states’
state licensing authority.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 40 of 46
(5) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(6) Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact,
that state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees who hold a
multistate license within that state of such termination. The terminated state
shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of termination.
(7) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless
agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
(8) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing
party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
(c) Dispute resolution.
(1) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among member states and
between Member and nonmember states.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 41 of 46
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(d) Enforcement.
(1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions of this compact and the Commission’s rules.
(2) By majority vote as provided by Commission rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a member state in default in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive
remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
(3) A member state may initiate legal action against the Commission in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance
with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 42 of 46
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(4) No individual or entity other than a member state may enforce this
compact against the Commission.
§ 303. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall
convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to
determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially
different than the model Compact statute.
(A) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in section 302 of this title.
(B) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
member states should be less than seven.
(2) Member states enacting the Compact subsequent to the charter
member states shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision
299(c)(24) of this title to determine if their enactments are materially different
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 43 of 46
from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance
of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date
of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered
to be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated by the
Commission.
(4) Any state that joins the Compact shall be subject to the
Commission’s rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the
Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted
by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the
Compact becomes law in that state.
(b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing that state’s enactment of the Compact.
(1) A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s state licensing authority to comply with the investigative
and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 44 of 46
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a
state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees
within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses
granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of
such notice of withdrawal.
(c) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or
prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions
of this compact.
(d) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment
to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state
until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
§ 304. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
(a) This compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration of, the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 45 of 46
jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is
held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of
the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may
deny a state’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of section 302 of this title, terminate a member state’s
participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement
of a member state is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this
compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member
states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all
severable matters.
§ 305. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law
of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member
state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
VT LEG #384722 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.539
2026 Page 46 of 46
(c) All permissible agreements between the Commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on June 1, 2027.
VT LEG #384722 v.1